District of Columbia statutes.
7-755.02

Commission duties and functions.

(a)

The Commission shall:

(1)

Analyze each election ward in the city for health disparities related to the following diseases, conditions, and health indicators:

(A)

Diabetes;

(B)

Asthma;

(C)

Infant mortality, including sudden infant death syndrome;

(D)

HIV/AIDS;

(E)

Heart disease;

(F)

Stroke;

(G)

Breast cancer, cervical cancer, and prostate cancer;

(H)

Chronic kidney disease;

(I)

Mental health;

(J)

Women’s health issues;

(K)

Smoking cessation;

(L)

Oral disease;

(M)

Immunization rates of children and senior citizens; and

(N)

Any other disease, condition, or health indicator that the Commission considers appropriate;

(2)

Gather information from public hearings, inquires, and studies to understand how the District government may work to eliminate health disparities;

(3)

Seek federal grants, if available; and

(4)

Submit a formal city action plan by March 1st of each year to the Department of Health, the Mayor, and the Council.

(b)

The formal city action plan required by subsection (a)(4) of this section hall be a public document and shall include, at a minimum:

(1)

A report of the Commission’s findings regarding the prevalence and severity of the diseases, conditions, or health indicators studied that highlight the election ward and demographic most affected; possible steps that can be taken by the District government to remedy these issues; and, expected outcomes that will result from taking the recommended steps; and

(2)

Draft legislation, regulations, amendments to statutes or regulations, or any other specific steps for implementing the recommendations described in paragraph (1) of this subsection.

Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-192, § 3, 61 DCR 12403